Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ST. PAUL; EASTBOUND KELLOGG BOULEVARD BRIDGE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $....... is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50, to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of St. Paul to design, acquire right-of-way, and construct a replacement for eastbound Kellogg Boulevard Bridge No. 90378 near the St. Paul RiverCentre. This appropriation includes money for internal staff costs, right-of-way acquisition, design, project administration, engineering and inspection, and reconstruction, rehabilitation and replacement of Kellogg Boulevard between West Seventh Street and Market Street, including Eagle Street, Exchange Street, and RiverCentre Loading Dock Road, and including but not limited to bridge structures, adjacent structures, other structures and infrastructure, roadway, retaining walls, bluff stabilization systems, temporary shoring, maintenance of traffic, communications, sewer utility, water utility, other utilities, fire suppression systems, HVAC systems, security and safety systems, items to facilitate access and inspection, snowmelt systems, and environmental remediation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $....... in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end